Washington statutes.
RCW 29B.40.080

Expenditures—Authorization of and restrictions on. (Effective January 1, 2026.)

No expenditures may be made or incurred by any candidate or political committee unless authorized by the candidate or the person or persons named on the candidate's or committee's registration form. A record of all such expenditures shall be maintained by the treasurer.

No expenditure of more than fifty dollars may be made in currency unless a receipt, signed by the recipient and by the candidate or treasurer, is prepared and made a part of the campaign's or political committee's financial records.

[ 2024 c 164 s 450; 2010 c 204 s 605; 2007 c 358 s 3; 1989 c 280 s 7; 1985 c 367 s 5; 1973 c 1 s 7 (Initiative Measure No. 276, approved November 7, 1972). Formerly RCW 42.17A.425, 42.17.070.]

NOTES:

Intent—Construction—Rules remain valid—Effective date—2024 c 164: See notes following RCW 29B.10.010.

Effective date—2010 c 204 ss 101-504, 506-601, 603-702, and 801-1103: See note following RCW 29B.15.010.

Effective date—2007 c 358: See note following RCW 29B.25.020.

Effective date—1989 c 280: See note following RCW 29B.25.020.

Effective date—Construction—1973 c 1: See notes following RCW 29B.05.010.